Utah statutes.
19-3-204.   Governor to designate state official to administer compact -- Designated officials comprise northwest low-level waste compact committee -- Meetings of committee -- Duties relating to existing regulations -- Authority to make arrangements with entities outside region of party states.

(1)  The governor of each party state shall designate one state official as the person responsible for administration of this compact.  The officials so designated shall together comprise the northwest low-level waste compact committee.

(2)  The committee shall meet as required to consider matters arising under this compact.

(3)  The parties shall inform the committee of existing regulations concerning low-level waste management in their states and shall afford all parties a reasonable opportunity to review and comment upon any proposed modifications in the regulations.

(4)  Notwithstanding any provision of Section  19-3-203 to the contrary, the committee may enter into arrangements with states, provinces, individual generators, or regional compact entities outside the region comprised of the party states for access to facilities on terms and conditions  the committee considers appropriate.  However, a two-thirds vote of all members is required, including the affirmative vote of the member of any party state in which a facility affected by the arrangement is located, for the committee to enter into an arrangement.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 112, 1991 General Session

